tests/clitics.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../mal.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../mal.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] clitics": 
     രാജു<np><ant><m><sg><nom>+വും<cnjcoo> : രാജുവും
     രാധ<np><ant><f><sg><nom>+യും<cnjcoo> : രാധയും
     അനാമിക<np><ant><f><sg><nom>+യും<cnjcoo> : അനാമികയും
     നര്‍ത്തകി<np><ant><f><sg><nom>+യും<cnjcoo> : നര്‍ത്തകിയും
     ത്രിഷങ്കു<np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+വും<cnjcoo> : ത്രിഷങ്കുവും
     ഗോഖലെ<np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+യും<cnjcoo> : ഗോഖലെയും 
     വൈയ്ക്കൊ<np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+യും<cnjcoo> : വൈയ്ക്കൊയും
     മുഴുവന്‍ <np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+നും<cnjcoo> : മുഴുവനും
     ആള്‍ <np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+ളും<cnjcoo> : ആളും
     അബൂബകര്‍ <np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+റും<cnjcoo> : അബൂബകറും 
     അനില്‍<np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+റും<cnjcoo> : അനിലും 
     ശ്വാസം<np><ant><mf><sg><nom>+വും<cnjcoo> : ശ്വാസവും 
